Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB93.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17A-132 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cost sharing":
1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, means the
cost to an insured under a health benefit plan according to any
copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket expense
requirements imposed by the plan; and
2. Does not include a coverage limit authorized under this section;
(b) "Hearing aid" means any wearable, nondisposable instrument or device
designed to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and any parts,
attachments, or accessories, including earmolds, but excluding batteries and
cords; and
(c)[(b)] "Related services" means those services necessary to assess, select, and
appropriately adjust or fit the hearing aid to ensure optimal performance.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) or (5) of this section:
(a) All[A] health benefit plans[plan] shall provide coverage for hearing aids and
related services in accordance with this section and administrative
regulations promulgated under this section for children with hearing loss
that is documented by a physician or audiologist;
(b) The coverage required under this subsection shall include coverage, without
cost sharing, for one (1) hearing aid per hard-of-hearing or deaf ear:
1. Regardless of the degree of hearing loss; and
2. That is not less than the cost of a reasonable and customary hearing
aid;
(c) The commissioner shall, in consultation with the Kentucky Commission on
Page 1 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
the Deaf and Hard of Hearing:
1. Promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish a minimum coverage amount per hearing aid
for the coverage required under this section, except a minimum
coverage amount shall not be less than two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500); and
2. Annually review the minimum coverage amount established under
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph to ensure that the coverage
requirements of this subsection are satisfied; and
(d) If the commissioner determines that an adjustment in the minimum
coverage amount is necessary to satisfy the coverage requirements of this
subsection, the commissioner shall amend the administrative regulation to
make the adjustment.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the coverage required under this
section shall not be less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per[,
subject to all applicable copayments, coinsurance, deductibles, and out-of-pocket
limits, for the full cost of one (1)] hearing aid [per hearing-impaired ear up to one
thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) ]every thirty-six (36) months for hearing
aids for insured individuals under eighteen (18) years of age and all related services
which shall be prescribed by an audiologist licensed under KRS Chapter 334A and
dispensed by an audiologist or hearing instrument specialist licensed under KRS
Chapter 334.
(4) An[The] insured may choose a higher priced hearing aid and may pay the
difference in cost above the amount covered by the health benefit plan[one
thousand four hundred dollar ($1,400) limit as provided in this section] without any
financial or contractual penalty to the insured or to the provider of the hearing aid.
(5) If the application of any requirement of this section would be the sole cause of a
Page 2 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
health benefit plan's failure to qualify as a Health Savings Account-qualified
High Deductible Health Plan under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, then the
requirement shall not apply to that health benefit plan until the minimum
deductible under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, is satisfied.
(6) (a) An insurer or administrator that utilizes a network to provide hearing aids
and related services under a health benefit plan shall ensure that the
network is reasonably adequate and accessible with respect to the provision
of hearing aids and related services required to be covered under this
section.
(b) A reasonably adequate and accessible network, with respect to the provision
of hearing aids and related services required to be covered under this
section, shall, at a minimum, offer an adequate number of accessible
pediatric audiologists.
[(3) A health benefit plan shall not be required to pay a claim filed by its insured for
payment of the cost of a hearing aid under the coverage required by subsection (2)
of this section if less than three (3) years prior to the date of the claim its insured
filed a claim for payment of the cost of a hearing aid under the required coverage
and the claim was paid by any health benefit plan.]
Section 2. KRS 304.17A-131 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "cost sharing":
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, means the cost to an
insured under a health benefit plan according to any copayment,
coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket expense requirements
imposed by the plan; and
(b) Does not include a coverage limit authorized under this section.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) All health benefit plans shall provide coverage for cochlear implants in
Page 3 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
accordance with this section and administrative regulations promulgated
under this section;[ for persons diagnosed with profound hearing
impairment.]
(b) Subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection, the coverage required under this
subsection shall include coverage for cochlear implants, without cost
sharing, that is not less than:
1. The coverage required for cochlear implants under the federal Centers
for Medicaid and Medicare's national coverage determinations for
Medicare recipients; and
2. The cost of reasonable and customary cochlear implants; and
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, the coverage required
under this subsection shall not be less than the coverage that was required
under this section prior to the effective date of this Act.
(3) (a) The commissioner shall:
1. Promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish a minimum coverage amount per cochlear
implant for the coverage required under subsection (2) of this section;
and
2. Annually review the minimum coverage amount established in
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph to ensure that the coverage
requirements of subsection (2) of this section are satisfied.
(b) If the commissioner determines that an adjustment in the minimum
coverage amount is necessary to satisfy the coverage requirements of
subsection (2) of this section, the commissioner shall amend the
administrative regulation to make the adjustment.
(4) If the application of any requirement of this section would be the sole cause of a
health benefit plan's failure to qualify as a Health Savings Account-qualified
Page 4 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
High Deductible Health Plan under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, then the
requirement shall not apply to that health benefit plan until the minimum
deductible under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, is satisfied.
Section 3. KRS 205.522 is amended to read as follows:
(1) With respect to the administration and provision of Medicaid benefits pursuant to
this chapter, the Department for Medicaid Services, any managed care organization
contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter, and the state's
medical assistance program shall be subject to, and comply with, the following, as
applicable:
(a) KRS 304.17A-129;
(b) Sections 1 and 2 of this Act;
(c) KRS 304.17A-145;
(d)[(c)] KRS 304.17A-163;
(e)[(d)] KRS 304.17A-1631;
(f)[(e)] KRS 304.17A-167;
(g)[(f)] KRS 304.17A-235;
(h)[(g)] KRS 304.17A-257;
(i)[(h)] KRS 304.17A-259;
(j)[(i)] KRS 304.17A-263;
(k)[(j)] KRS 304.17A-264;
(l)[(k)] KRS 304.17A-515;
(m)[(l)] KRS 304.17A-580;
(n)[(m)] KRS 304.17A-600, 304.17A-603, and 304.17A-607; and
(o)[(n)] KRS 304.17A-740 to 304.17A-743.
(2) A managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to
this chapter shall comply with the reporting requirements of KRS 304.17A-732.
Section 4. KRS 205.6485 is amended to read as follows:
Page 5 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
(1) As used in this section, "KCHIP" means the Kentucky Children's Health Insurance
Program.
(2) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:
(a) Prepare a state child health plan, known as KCHIP, meeting the requirements
of Title XXI of the Federal Social Security Act, for submission to the
Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services
within such time as will permit the state to receive the maximum amounts of
federal matching funds available under Title XXI; and
(b) By administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A, establish the following:
1. The eligibility criteria for children covered by KCHIP, which shall
include a provision that no person eligible for services under Title XIX
of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 1396 to 1396v, as amended,
shall be eligible for services under KCHIP, except to the extent that
Title XIX coverage is expanded by KRS 205.6481 to 205.6495 and KRS
304.17A-340;
2. The schedule of benefits to be covered by KCHIP, which shall:
a. Be at least equivalent to one (1) of the following:
i. The standard Blue Cross/Blue Shield preferred provider
option under the Federal Employees Health Benefit Plan
established by 5 U.S.C. sec. 8903(1);
ii. A mid-range health benefit coverage plan that is offered and
generally available to state employees; or
iii. Health insurance coverage offered by a health maintenance
organization that has the largest insured commercial, non-
Medicaid enrollment of covered lives in the state; and
b. Comply with subsection (6) of this section;
Page 6 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
3. The premium contribution per family for health insurance coverage
available under KCHIP, which shall be based:
a. On a six (6) month period; and
b. Upon a sliding scale relating to family income not to exceed:
i. Ten dollars ($10), to be paid by a family with income
between one hundred percent (100%) to one hundred thirty-
three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level;
ii. Twenty dollars ($20), to be paid by a family with income
between one hundred thirty-four percent (134%) to one
hundred forty-nine percent (149%) of the federal poverty
level; and
iii. One hundred twenty dollars ($120), to be paid by a family
with income between one hundred fifty percent (150%) to
two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level, and
which may be made on a partial payment plan of twenty
dollars ($20) per month or sixty dollars ($60) per quarter;
4. There shall be no copayments for services provided under KCHIP; and
5. a. The criteria for health services providers and insurers wishing to
contract with the Commonwealth to provide coverage under
KCHIP.
b. The cabinet shall provide, in any contracting process for coverage
of preventive services, the opportunity for a public health
department to bid on preventive health services to eligible children
within the public health department's service area. A public health
department shall not be disqualified from bidding because the
department does not currently offer all the services required by
this section. The criteria shall be set forth in administrative
Page 7 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
regulations under KRS Chapter 13A and shall maximize
competition among the providers and insurers. The Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall provide oversight over contracting
policies and procedures to assure that the number of applicants for
contracts is maximized.
(3) Within twelve (12) months of federal approval of the state's Title XXI child health
plan, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall assure that a KCHIP
program is available to all eligible children in all regions of the state. If necessary,
in order to meet this assurance, the cabinet shall institute its own program.
(4) KCHIP recipients shall have direct access without a referral from any gatekeeper
primary care provider to dentists for covered primary dental services and to
optometrists and ophthalmologists for covered primary eye and vision services.
(5) KCHIP shall comply with KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631.
(6) The schedule of benefits required under subsection (2)(b)2. of this section shall
include:
(a) Preventive services;
(b) Vision services, including glasses;
(c) Dental services, including sealants, extractions, and fillings; and
(d) The coverage required under:
1. KRS 304.17A-129;
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act; and
3. KRS 304.17A-145.
Section 5. KRS 164.2871 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of each state postsecondary educational institution is
authorized to purchase liability insurance for the protection of the individual
members of the governing board, faculty, and staff of such institutions from liability
for acts and omissions committed in the course and scope of the individual's
Page 8 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
employment or service. Each institution may purchase the type and amount of
liability coverage deemed to best serve the interest of such institution.
(2) All retirement annuity allowances accrued or accruing to any employee of a state
postsecondary educational institution through a retirement program sponsored by
the state postsecondary educational institution are hereby exempt from any state,
county, or municipal tax, and shall not be subject to execution, attachment,
garnishment, or any other process whatsoever, nor shall any assignment thereof be
enforceable in any court. Except retirement benefits accrued or accruing to any
employee of a state postsecondary educational institution through a retirement
program sponsored by the state postsecondary educational institution on or after
January 1, 1998, shall be subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020, to the extent
provided in KRS 141.010 and 141.0215.
(3) Except as provided in KRS Chapter 44, the purchase of liability insurance for
members of governing boards, faculty and staff of institutions of higher education
in this state shall not be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity or any
other immunity or privilege.
(4) The governing board of each state postsecondary education institution is authorized
to provide a self-insured employer group health plan to its employees, which plan
shall:
(a) Conform to the requirements of Subtitle 32 of KRS Chapter 304; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, be exempt from
conformity with Subtitle 17A of KRS Chapter 304.
(5) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of a
state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.17A-129;
(b) Sections 1 and 2 of this Act;
(c) KRS 304.17A-133;
Page 9 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
(d)[(c)] KRS 304.17A-145;
(e)[(d)] KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(f)[(e)] KRS 304.17A-261;
(g)[(f)] KRS 304.17A-262;
(h)[(g)] KRS 304.17A-264; and
(i)[(h)] KRS 304.17A-265.
(6) (a) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of
a state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall provide a
special enrollment period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in
accordance with the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The governing board of a state postsecondary education institution shall, at or
before the time an employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the
plan or coverage, provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment
rights under this subsection.
Section 6. KRS 18A.225 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The term "employee" for purposes of this section means:
1. Any person, including an elected public official, who is regularly
employed by any department, office, board, agency, or branch of state
government; or by a public postsecondary educational institution; or by
any city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government, whose legislative body has opted to participate in the state-
sponsored health insurance program pursuant to KRS 79.080; and who
is either a contributing member to any one (1) of the retirement systems
administered by the state, including but not limited to the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, or the
Judicial Retirement Plan; or is receiving a contractual contribution from
Page 10 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
the state toward a retirement plan; or, in the case of a public
postsecondary education institution, is an individual participating in an
optional retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567; or is eligible to
participate in a retirement plan established by an employer who ceases
participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System pursuant to
KRS 61.522 whose employees participated in the health insurance plans
administered by the Personnel Cabinet prior to the employer's effective
cessation date in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System;
2. Any certified or classified employee of a local board of education or a
public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590;
3. Any elected member of a local board of education;
4. Any person who is a present or future recipient of a retirement
allowance from the Kentucky Retirement Systems, County Employees
Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, the
Legislators' Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, or the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System's optional
retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567, except that a person who is
receiving a retirement allowance and who is age sixty-five (65) or older
shall not be included, with the exception of persons covered under KRS
61.702(2)(b)3. and 78.5536(2)(b)3., unless he or she is actively
employed pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and
5. Any eligible dependents and beneficiaries of participating employees
and retirees who are entitled to participate in the state-sponsored health
insurance program;
(b) The term "health benefit plan" for the purposes of this section means a health
benefit plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-005;
(c) The term "insurer" for the purposes of this section means an insurer as defined
Page 11 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
in KRS 304.17A-005; and
(d) The term "managed care plan" for the purposes of this section means a
managed care plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-500.
(2) (a) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the
recommendation of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, shall procure, in
compliance with the provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090,
from one (1) or more insurers authorized to do business in this state, a group
health benefit plan that may include but not be limited to health maintenance
organization (HMO), preferred provider organization (PPO), point of service
(POS), and exclusive provider organization (EPO) benefit plans
encompassing all or any class or classes of employees. With the exception of
employers governed by the provisions of KRS Chapters 16, 18A, and 151B,
all employers of any class of employees or former employees shall enter into
a contract with the Personnel Cabinet prior to including that group in the state
health insurance group. The contracts shall include but not be limited to
designating the entity responsible for filing any federal forms, adoption of
policies required for proper plan administration, acceptance of the contractual
provisions with health insurance carriers or third-party administrators, and
adoption of the payment and reimbursement methods necessary for efficient
administration of the health insurance program. Health insurance coverage
provided to state employees under this section shall, at a minimum, contain
the same benefits as provided under Kentucky Kare Standard as of January 1,
1994, and shall include a mail-order drug option as provided in subsection
(13) of this section. All employees and other persons for whom the health care
coverage is provided or made available shall annually be given an option to
elect health care coverage through a self-funded plan offered by the
Commonwealth or, if a self-funded plan is not available, from a list of
Page 12 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
coverage options determined by the competitive bid process under the
provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090 and made available
during annual open enrollment.
(b) The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of insurance
and may contain the provisions the commissioner of insurance approves,
whether or not otherwise permitted by the insurance laws.
(c) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide coverage to all members of the state group, including active
employees and retirees and their eligible covered dependents and
beneficiaries, within the county or counties specified in its bid. Except as
provided in subsection (19)[(20)] of this section, any carrier bidding to offer
health care coverage to employees shall also agree to rate all employees as a
single entity, except for those retirees whose former employers insure their
active employees outside the state-sponsored health insurance program and as
otherwise provided in KRS 61.702(2)(b)3.b. and 78.5536(2)(b)3.b.
(d) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide enrollment, claims, and utilization data to the Commonwealth in a
format specified by the Personnel Cabinet with the understanding that the data
shall be owned by the Commonwealth; to provide data in an electronic form
and within a time frame specified by the Personnel Cabinet; and to be subject
to penalties for noncompliance with data reporting requirements as specified
by the Personnel Cabinet. The Personnel Cabinet shall take strict precautions
to protect the confidentiality of each individual employee; however,
confidentiality assertions shall not relieve a carrier from the requirement of
providing stipulated data to the Commonwealth.
(e) The Personnel Cabinet shall develop the necessary techniques and capabilities
for timely analysis of data received from carriers and, to the extent possible,
Page 13 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
provide in the request-for-proposal specifics relating to data requirements,
electronic reporting, and penalties for noncompliance. The Commonwealth
shall own the enrollment, claims, and utilization data provided by each carrier
and shall develop methods to protect the confidentiality of the individual. The
Personnel Cabinet shall include in the October annual report submitted
pursuant to the provisions of KRS 18A.226 to the Governor, the General
Assembly, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, an analysis of the
financial stability of the program, which shall include but not be limited to
loss ratios, methods of risk adjustment, measurements of carrier quality of
service, prescription coverage and cost management, and statutorily required
mandates. If state self-insurance was available as a carrier option, the report
also shall provide a detailed financial analysis of the self-insurance fund
including but not limited to loss ratios, reserves, and reinsurance agreements.
(f) If any agency participating in the state-sponsored employee health insurance
program for its active employees terminates participation and there is a state
appropriation for the employer's contribution for active employees' health
insurance coverage, then neither the agency nor the employees shall receive
the state-funded contribution after termination from the state-sponsored
employee health insurance program.
(g) Any funds in flexible spending accounts that remain after all reimbursements
have been processed shall be transferred to the credit of the state-sponsored
health insurance plan's appropriation account.
(h) Each entity participating in the state-sponsored health insurance program shall
provide an amount at least equal to the state contribution rate for the employer
portion of the health insurance premium. For any participating entity that used
the state payroll system, the employer contribution amount shall be equal to
but not greater than the state contribution rate.
Page 14 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
(3) The premiums may be paid by the policyholder:
(a) Wholly from funds contributed by the employee, by payroll deduction or
otherwise;
(b) Wholly from funds contributed by any department, board, agency, public
postsecondary education institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county,
charter county, county, or consolidated local government; or
(c) Partly from each, except that any premium due for health care coverage or
dental coverage, if any, in excess of the premium amount contributed by any
department, board, agency, postsecondary education institution, or branch of
state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government for any other health care coverage shall be paid by the employee.
(4) If an employee moves his or her place of residence or employment out of the
service area of an insurer offering a managed health care plan, under which he or
she has elected coverage, into either the service area of another managed health care
plan or into an area of the Commonwealth not within a managed health care plan
service area, the employee shall be given an option, at the time of the move or
transfer, to change his or her coverage to another health benefit plan.
(5) No payment of premium by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary
educational institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county,
county, or consolidated local government shall constitute compensation to an
insured employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the
compensation of such an employee. Any premium or other expense incurred by any
department, board, agency, public postsecondary educational institution, or branch
of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government shall be considered a proper cost of administration.
(6) The policy or policies may contain the provisions with respect to the class or classes
of employees covered, amounts of insurance or coverage for designated classes or
Page 15 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
groups of employees, policy options, terms of eligibility, and continuation of
insurance or coverage after retirement.
(7) Group rates under this section shall be made available to the disabled child of an
employee regardless of the child's age if the entire premium for the disabled child's
coverage is paid by the state employee. A child shall be considered disabled if he or
she has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits.
(8) The health care contract or contracts for employees shall be entered into for a
period of not less than one (1) year.
(9) The secretary shall appoint thirty-two (32) persons to an Advisory Committee of
State Health Insurance Subscribers to advise the secretary or the secretary's
designee regarding the state-sponsored health insurance program for employees.
The secretary shall appoint, from a list of names submitted by appointing
authorities, members representing school districts from each of the seven (7)
Supreme Court districts, members representing state government from each of the
seven (7) Supreme Court districts, two (2) members representing retirees under age
sixty-five (65), one (1) member representing local health departments, two (2)
members representing the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and three (3)
members at large. The secretary shall also appoint two (2) members from a list of
five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky Education Association, two (2) members
from a list of five (5) names submitted by the largest state employee organization of
nonschool state employees, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted
by the Kentucky Association of Counties, two (2) members from a list of five (5)
names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, and two (2) members from a
list of names consisting of five (5) names submitted by each state employee
organization that has two thousand (2,000) or more members on state payroll
deduction. The advisory committee shall be appointed in January of each year and
shall meet quarterly.
Page 16 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the policy or policies
provided to employees pursuant to this section shall not provide coverage for
obtaining or performing an abortion, nor shall any state funds be used for the
purpose of obtaining or performing an abortion on behalf of employees or their
dependents.
(11) Interruption of an established treatment regime with maintenance drugs shall be
grounds for an insured to appeal a formulary change through the established appeal
procedures approved by the Department of Insurance, if the physician supervising
the treatment certifies that the change is not in the best interests of the patient.
(12) Any employee who is eligible for and elects to participate in the state health
insurance program as a retiree, or the spouse or beneficiary of a retiree, under any
one (1) of the state-sponsored retirement systems shall not be eligible to receive the
state health insurance contribution toward health care coverage as a result of any
other employment for which there is a public employer contribution. This does not
preclude a retiree and an active employee spouse from using both contributions to
the extent needed for purchase of one (1) state sponsored health insurance policy
for that plan year.
(13) (a) The policies of health insurance coverage procured under subsection (2) of
this section shall include a mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs for
state employees. Maintenance drugs may be dispensed by mail order in
accordance with Kentucky law.
(b) A health insurer shall not discriminate against any retail pharmacy located
within the geographic coverage area of the health benefit plan and that meets
the terms and conditions for participation established by the insurer, including
price, dispensing fee, and copay requirements of a mail-order option. The
retail pharmacy shall not be required to dispense by mail.
(c) The mail-order option shall not permit the dispensing of a controlled
Page 17 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
substance classified in Schedule II.
[(14) The policy or policies provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to
this section shall provide coverage for obtaining a hearing aid and acquiring hearing
aid-related services for insured individuals under eighteen (18) years of age, subject
to a cap of one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) every thirty-six (36) months
pursuant to KRS 304.17A-132.]
(14)[(15)] Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this
section shall provide coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum
disorders consistent with KRS 304.17A-142.
(15)[(16)] Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this
section shall provide coverage for obtaining amino acid-based elemental formula
pursuant to KRS 304.17A-258.
(16)[(17)] If a state employee's residence and place of employment are in the same
county, and if the hospital located within that county does not offer surgical
services, intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services,
diagnostic cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging
services, the employee may select a plan available in a contiguous county that does
provide those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the amount
available in the county where the plan selected is located.
(17)[(18)] If a state employee's residence and place of employment are each located in
counties in which the hospitals do not offer surgical services, intensive care
services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic cardiac
catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the employee
may select a plan available in a county contiguous to the county of residence that
does provide those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the
amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.
(18)[(19)] The Personnel Cabinet is encouraged to study whether it is fair and reasonable
Page 18 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
and in the best interests of the state group to allow any carrier bidding to offer
health care coverage under this section to submit bids that may vary county by
county or by larger geographic areas.
(19)[(20)] Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the bid for proposals for
health insurance coverage for calendar year 2004 shall include a bid scenario that
reflects the statewide rating structure provided in calendar year 2003 and a bid
scenario that allows for a regional rating structure that allows carriers to submit bids
that may vary by region for a given product offering as described in this subsection:
(a) The regional rating bid scenario shall not include a request for bid on a
statewide option;
(b) The Personnel Cabinet shall divide the state into geographical regions which
shall be the same as the partnership regions designated by the Department for
Medicaid Services for purposes of the Kentucky Health Care Partnership
Program established pursuant to 907 KAR 1:705;
(c) The request for proposal shall require a carrier's bid to include every county
within the region or regions for which the bid is submitted and include but not
be restricted to a preferred provider organization (PPO) option;
(d) If the Personnel Cabinet accepts a carrier's bid, the cabinet shall award the
carrier all of the counties included in its bid within the region. If the Personnel
Cabinet deems the bids submitted in accordance with this subsection to be in
the best interests of state employees in a region, the cabinet may award the
contract for that region to no more than two (2) carriers; and
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Personnel Cabinet from including
other requirements or criteria in the request for proposal.
(20)[(21)] Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed
on or after July 12, 2006, to public employees pursuant to this section which
provides coverage for services rendered by a physician or osteopath duly licensed
Page 19 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
under KRS Chapter 311 that are within the scope of practice of an optometrist duly
licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 320 shall provide the same payment
of coverage to optometrists as allowed for those services rendered by physicians or
osteopaths.
(21)[(22)] Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.12-237;
(b) KRS 304.17A-270 and 304.17A-525;
(c) KRS 304.17A-600 to 304.17A-633;
(d) KRS 205.593;
(e) KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730;
(f) KRS 304.14-135;
(g) KRS 304.17A-580 and 304.17A-641;
(h) KRS 304.99-123;
(i) KRS 304.17A-138;
(j) KRS 304.17A-148;
(k) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(l) KRS 304.17A-265;
(m) KRS 304.17A-261;
(n) KRS 304.17A-262;
(o) KRS 304.17A-145;
(p) KRS 304.17A-129;
(q) KRS 304.17A-133;
(r) KRS 304.17A-264;[ and]
(s) Sections 1 and 2 of this Act; and
(t) Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to statutes listed in this
subsection.
Page 20 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
(22)[(23)] (a) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or
renewed to public employees pursuant to this section shall provide a special
enrollment period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in
accordance with the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The Department of Employee Insurance shall, at or before the time a public
employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the plan or coverage,
provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment rights under this
subsection.
Section 7. Sections 1, 2, 5, and 6 of this Act apply to health benefit plans issued
or renewed on or after January 1, 2026.
Section 8. (1) For purposes of 45 C.F.R. sec. 155.170, the benefits required
under KRS 304.17A-131 and 304.17A-132 prior to the effective date of this Act shall be
considered by the state as "[a] benefit required by state action taking place on or before
December 31, 2011" and thus the state shall not consider or identify the benefits required
under KRS 304.17A-131 and 304.17A-132 prior to the effective date of this Act as being
in addition to the essential health benefits required under federal law.
(2) The commissioner of insurance and any other state official or state agency
shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of this section; and
(b) Not take any action that is in violation of or in conflict with this section.
Section 9. Notwithstanding KRS 194A.099:
(1) Within 90 days of the effective date of this section and subject to Section 8 of
this Act, the Department of Insurance shall identify, in accordance with 45 C.F.R. sec.
155.170(a)(3), whether the application of any requirement of subsection (2) of Section 1
of this Act or subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act to a qualified health plan (QHP) is in
addition to the essential health benefits required under federal law; and
(2) If it is determined that the application of any requirement of subsection (2) of
Page 21 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 93/GA
Section 1 of this Act or subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act to a QHP is in addition to
the essential health benefits required under federal law, then the department shall, within
180 days of the effective date of this section, apply for a waiver under 42 U.S.C. sec.
18052, as amended, or any other applicable federal law of all or any of the cost defrayal
requirements under 42 U.S.C. sec. 18031(d)(3) and 45 C.F.R. sec. 155.170, as amended.
Section 10. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services determines that a
waiver or authorization from a federal agency is necessary to implement Section 3 or 4 of
this Act for any reason, including the loss of federal funds, the cabinet shall, within 90
days of the effective date of this section, request the waiver or authorization, and may
only delay implementation of those provisions for which a waiver or authorization was
deemed necessary until the waiver or authorization is granted.
Section 11. Sections 1 to 7 of this Act take effect January 1, 2026.
Page 22 of 22
SB009310.100 - 82 - XXXX 3/5/2025 3:32 PM GA